District of Columbia statutes.
47-1810.06

Designation of agent.

As a filing convenience, and without changing the respective liability of group members, members of a combined reporting group shall designate one taxpayer member of the combined group to file a single return, in the form and manner prescribed by the Chief Financial Officer, in lieu of filing their own respective returns; provided, that the taxpayer designated to file the single return consents to act as surety with respect to the tax liability of all other taxpayers properly included in the combined report and agrees to act as agent on behalf of those taxpayers for tax matters relating to the combined report. If for any reason the agent is unwilling or unable to perform its responsibilities, tax liability may be assessed against the taxpayer members.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 8002(d), 58 DCR 6226
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7102(d), 60 DCR 12472
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote the section.
Section 302(d) of D.C. Law 19-226 amended this section to read as follows:
“§ 47-1810.06. Designation of agent.
“As a filing convenience, and without changing the respective liability of group members, members of a combined reporting group shall designate one taxpayer member of the combined group to file a single return, in the form and manner prescribed by the Chief Financial Officer, in lieu of filing their own respective returns; provided, that the taxpayer designated to file the single return consents to act as surety with respect to the tax liability of all other taxpayers properly included in the combined report and agrees to act as agent on behalf of those taxpayers for tax matters relating to the combined report. If for any reason the agent is unwilling or unable to perform its responsibilities, tax liability may be assessed against the taxpayer members.”
Section 303 of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that § 302 of the act shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 302(a) and (d) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-482, October 12, 2012, 59 DCR 12478), applicable for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 302(a) and (d) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-482, October 12, 2012, 59 DCR 12478), applicable for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 7102(d) and 7103 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 7102(d) and 7103 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7101 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Combined Reporting Clarification Act of 2013”.

Section 8004 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided: “Sec. 8004. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.”

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 7103 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that § 7102 of the act shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.